Ohio, session 136, HB659.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That sections 2305.111 and 2315.18 of the Revised Code be amended to read as follows: Sec. 2305.111. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Childhood sexual abuse" means any conduct that constitutes any of the violations identified in division (A)(1)(a) or (b) of this section and would constitute a criminal offense under the specified section of the Revised Code, if the victim of the violation is at the time of the violation a child under eighteen years of age or a child with a developmental disability or physical impairment under twenty-one years of age. The court need not find that any person has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to the offense under the specified section of the Revised Code in order for the conduct that is the violation constituting the offense to be childhood sexual abuse for purposes of this division. This division applies to any of the following violations committed in the following specified circumstances: (a) A violation of section 2907.02 or section 2907.03 of the Revised Code; (b) A violation of section 2907.05 or 2907.06 of the Revised Code if, at the time of the violation, any of the following apply: (i) The actor is the victim's natural parent, adoptive parent, or stepparent or the guardian, custodian, or person in loco parentis of the victim. (ii) The victim is in custody of law or a patient in a hospital or other institution, and the actor has supervisory or disciplinary authority over the victim. (iii) The actor is a teacher, administrator, coach, or other person in authority employed by or serving in a school for which the director of education and workforce prescribes minimum standards pursuant to division (D) of section 3301.07 of the Revised Code, the victim is enrolled in or attends that school, and the actor is not enrolled in and does not attend that school. (iv) The actor is a teacher, administrator, coach, or other person in authority employed by or serving in an institution of higher education, and the victim is enrolled in or attends that institution. (v) The actor is the victim's athletic or other type of coach, is the victim's instructor, is the leader of a scouting troop of which the victim is a member, or is a person with temporary or occasional disciplinary control over the victim. (vi) The actor is a mental health professional, the victim is a mental health client or patient of the actor, and the actor induces the victim to submit by falsely representing to the victim that the sexual contact involved in the violation is necessary for mental health treatment purposes. (vii) The actor is a licensed medical professional, the victim is a patient of the actor, and the sexual contact occurs in the course of medical treatment. (viii) The victim is confined in a detention facility, and the actor is an employee of that detention facility. (ix) The actor is a cleric, and the victim is a member of, or attends, the church or congregation served by the cleric. (2) "Cleric" has the same meaning as in section 2317.02 of the Revised Code. (3) "Licensed medical professional" has the same meaning as in section 2907.01 of the Revised Code. (4) "Mental health client or patient" has the same meaning as in section 2305.51 of the Revised Code. (5) "Mental health professional" has the same meaning as in section 2305.115 of the Revised Code. (6) "Sexual contact" has the same meaning as in section 2907.01 of the Revised Code. (7) "Student" means any person who is enrolled on a full-time or part-time basis in any of the following: (a) A state institution of higher education as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code; (b) A nonprofit institution holding a certificate of authorization pursuant to Chapter 1713. of the Revised Code; (c) An institution holding a certificate of registration from the state board of career colleges and schools under Chapter 3332. of the Revised Code; (d) A private institution exempt from regulation under Chapter 3332. of the Revised Code as prescribed in section 3333.046 of the Revised Code; (e) An Ohio technical center as defined in section 3333.94 of the Revised Code. (8) "Student sexual abuse" means any conduct that constitutes a violation of section 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.05, or 2907.06 of the Revised Code, if the victim of the violation is at the time of the violation over seventeen years of age but under twenty-four years of age, and the abuse occurred when the victim was a student. The court need not find that any person has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to the offense under the specified section of the Revised Code in order for the conduct that is the violation constituting the offense to be student sexual abuse for purposes of this section. (9) "Victim" means, except as provided in division (B) of this section, a victim of childhood sexual abuse. (B) Except as provided in section 2305.115 of the Revised Code and subject to division (C)divisions (C) and (D) of this section, an action for assault or battery shall be brought within one year after the cause of the action accrues. For purposes of this section, a cause of action for assault or battery accrues upon the later of the following: (1) The date on which the alleged assault or battery occurred; (2) If the plaintiff did not know the identity of the person who allegedly committed the assault or battery on the date on which it allegedly occurred, the earlier of the following dates: (a) The date on which the plaintiff learns the identity of that person; (b) The date on which, by the exercise of reasonable diligence, the plaintiff should have learned the identity of that person. (C)(1) Except as provided in division (C)(2)(C)(3) of this section, an action shall be brought within thirty-seven years after the cause of action accrues if both of the following apply: (a) The action is an action for assault or battery brought by a victim of childhood sexual abuse based on childhood sexual abuse, or an action brought by a victim of childhood sexual abuse asserting any claim resulting from childhood sexual abuse, shall be brought within twelve years after the cause of action accrues. (b) The action is against a perpetrator of the childhood sexual abuse, an entity that negligently facilitated that sexual abuse, or both. (2) If a DNA record made in connection with an action brought by a victim of childhood sexual abuse asserting a claim resulting from childhood sexual abuse is determined to match another DNA record that is of an identifiable person and if the time of the determination is later than thirty-seven years after the action accrues, the action may be brought within five years after the determination is complete. If the defendant in an action brought by a victim of childhood sexual abuse asserting a claim resulting from childhood sexual abuse that occurs on or after August 3, 2006, has fraudulently concealed from the plaintiff facts that form the basis of the claim, the running of the limitations period with regard to that claim is tolled until the time when the plaintiff discovers or in the exercise of due diligence should have discovered those facts, and the action may be brought within five years after the discovery of the fraudulently concealed facts. (2)(3) Only for purposes of making claims against a bankruptcy estate of an organization chartered under part B of subtitle II of Title 36 of the United States Code, an action for assault or battery brought by a victim of childhood sexual abuse based on childhood sexual abuse, or an action brought by a victim of childhood sexual abuse asserting any claim resulting from childhood sexual abuse, may be brought at any time after the cause of action accrues. (3)(4) For purposes of this section, a cause of action for assault or battery based on childhood sexual abuse, or a cause of action for a claim resulting from childhood sexual abuse, accrues upon the date on which the victim reaches the age of majority. (D)(1) An action shall be brought at any time until the victim reaches fifty-five years of age if both of the following apply: (a) The action is an action for assault or battery brought by a victim of student sexual abuse based on student sexual abuse, or an action brought by a victim of student sexual abuse asserting any claim resulting from student sexual abuse. (b) The action is against a perpetrator of the student sexual abuse or an entity that negligently facilitated that sexual abuse. (2) If a DNA record made in connection with an action brought by a victim of student sexual abuse asserting a claim resulting from student sexual abuse is determined to match another DNA record that is of an identifiable person and if the time of the determination is later than the time at which the victim reaches fifty-five years of age, the action may be brought within five years after the determination is complete. If the defendant in an action brought by a victim of student sexual abuse asserting a claim resulting from student sexual abuse that occurs on or after the effective date of this section has fraudulently concealed from the plaintiff facts that form the basis of the claim, the running of the limitations period with regard to that claim is tolled until the time when the plaintiff discovers or in the exercise of due diligence should have discovered those facts, and the action may be brought within five years after the discovery of the fraudulently concealed facts. Sec. 2315.18. (A) As used in this section and in section 2315.19 of the Revised Code: (1) "Asbestos claim" has the same meaning as in section 2307.91 of the Revised Code. (2) "Economic loss" means any of the following types of pecuniary harm: (a) All wages, salaries, or other compensation lost as a result of an injury or loss to person or property that is a subject of a tort action; (b) All expenditures for medical care or treatment, rehabilitation services, or other care, treatment, services, products, or accommodations as a result of an injury or loss to person or property that is a subject of a tort action; (c) Any other expenditures incurred as a result of an injury or loss to person or property that is a subject of a tort action, other than attorney's fees incurred in connection with that action. (3) "Medical claim," "dental claim," "optometric claim," and "chiropractic claim" have the same meanings as in section 2305.113 of the Revised Code. (4) "Noneconomic loss" means nonpecuniary harm that results from an injury or loss to person or property that is a subject of a tort action, including, but not limited to, pain and suffering, loss of society, consortium, companionship, care, assistance, attention, protection, advice, guidance, counsel, instruction, training, or education, disfigurement, mental anguish, and any other intangible loss. (5) "Occurrence" means all claims resulting from or arising out of any one person's bodily injury. (6) "Product liability claim" has the same meaning as in section 2307.71 of the Revised Code. (7) "Tort action" means a civil action for damages for injury or loss to person or property. "Tort action" includes a civil action upon a product liability claim or an asbestos claim, a civil action based on an unlawful discriminatory practice relating to employment brought under section 4112.052 of the Revised Code, and a civil action brought under section 4112.14 of the Revised Code. "Tort action" does not include a civil action upon a medical claim, dental claim, optometric claim, or chiropractic claim or a civil action for damages for a breach of contract or another agreement between persons. (8) "Trier of fact" means the jury or, in a nonjury action, the court. (B) In a tort action to recover damages for injury or loss to person or property, all of the following apply: (1) There shall not be any limitation on the amount of compensatory damages that represents the economic loss of the person who is awarded the damages in the tort action. (2) Except as otherwise provided in division (B)(3) or (4) of this section, the amount of compensatory damages that represents damages for noneconomic loss that is recoverable in a tort action under this section to recover damages for injury or loss to person or property shall not exceed the greater of two hundred fifty thousand dollars or an amount that is equal to three times the economic loss, as determined by the trier of fact, of the plaintiff in that tort action to a maximum of three hundred fifty thousand dollars for each plaintiff in that tort action or a maximum of five hundred thousand dollars for each occurrence that is the basis of that tort action. (3) There shall not be any limitation on the amount of compensatory damages that represents damages for noneconomic loss that is recoverable in a tort action to recover damages for injury or loss to person or property if the noneconomic losses of the plaintiff are for either of the following: (a) Permanent and substantial physical deformity, loss of use of a limb, or loss of a bodily organ system; (b) Permanent physical functional injury that permanently prevents the injured person from being able to independently care for self and perform life-sustaining activities. (4) There shall not be any limitation on the amount of compensatory damages that represents damages for noneconomic loss that is recoverable in a tort action to recover damages for injury or loss to person or property if the noneconomic losses of the plaintiff are due to childhood sexual abuse, student sexual abuse, or a violation of section 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.05, or 2907.06 of the Revised Code. The court need not find that any person has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to the offense under the specified section of the Revised Code in order for compensatory damages to be awarded under this division. (C) In determining an award of compensatory damages for noneconomic loss in a tort action, the trier of fact shall not consider any of the following: (1) Evidence of a defendant's alleged wrongdoing, misconduct, or guilt; (2) Evidence of the defendant's wealth or financial resources; (3) All other evidence that is offered for the purpose of punishing the defendant, rather than offered for a compensatory purpose. (D) If a trial is conducted in a tort action to recover damages for injury or loss to person or property and a plaintiff prevails in that action, the court in a nonjury trial shall make findings of fact, and the jury in a jury trial shall return a general verdict accompanied by answers to interrogatories, that shall specify all of the following: (1) The total compensatory damages recoverable by the plaintiff; (2) The portion of the total compensatory damages that represents damages for economic loss; (3) The portion of the total compensatory damages that represents damages for noneconomic loss. (E)(1) After the trier of fact in a tort action to recover damages for injury or loss to person or property complies with division (D) of this section, the court shall enter a judgment in favor of the plaintiff for compensatory damages for economic loss in the amount determined pursuant to division (D)(2) of this section, and, subject to division (F)(1) of this section, the court shall enter a judgment in favor of the plaintiff for compensatory damages for noneconomic loss. Except as provided in division (B)(3) or (4) of this section, in no event shall a judgment for compensatory damages for noneconomic loss exceed the maximum recoverable amount that represents damages for noneconomic loss as provided in division (B)(2) of this section. Division (B) of this section shall be applied in a jury trial only after the jury has made its factual findings and determination as to the damages. (2) Prior to the trial in the tort action described in division (D) of this section, any party may seek summary judgment with respect to the nature of the alleged injury or loss to person or property, seeking a determination of the damages as described in division (B)(2) of this section. (F)(1) A court of common pleas has no jurisdiction to enter judgment on an award of compensatory damages for noneconomic loss in excess of the limits set forth in this section. (2) If the trier of fact is a jury, the court shall not instruct the jury with respect to the limit on compensatory damages for noneconomic loss described in division (B)(2) of this section, and neither counsel for any party nor a witness shall inform the jury or potential jurors of that limit. (G) With respect to a tort action to which division (B)(2) of this section applies, any excess amount of compensatory damages for noneconomic loss that is greater than the applicable amount specified in division (B)(2) of this section shall not be reallocated to any other tortfeasor beyond the amount of compensatory damages that the tortfeasor would otherwise be responsible for under the laws of this state. (H) This section does not apply to any of the following: (1) Tort actions that are brought against the state in the court of claims, including, but not limited to, those actions in which a state university or college is a defendant and to which division (B)(3) of section 3345.40 of the Revised Code applies; (2) Tort actions that are brought against political subdivisions of this state and that are commenced under or are subject to Chapter 2744. of the Revised Code. Division (C) of section 2744.05 of the Revised Code applies to recoverable damages in those actions. (3) Wrongful death actions brought pursuant to Chapter 2125. of the Revised Code. (I) If the provisions regarding the limits on compensatory damages for noneconomic loss set forth in division (B)(2) of this section have been determined to be unconstitutional, then division (C) of this section and section 2315.19 of the Revised Code shall govern the determination of an award of compensatory damages for noneconomic loss in a tort action. Section 2. That existing sections 2305.111 and 2315.18 of the Revised Code are hereby repealed. Section 3. That section 2305.111 of the Revised Code that is scheduled to take effect on October 12, 2028, be amended to read as follows: Sec. 2305.111. (A) As used in this section: (1) "Childhood sexual abuse" means any conduct that constitutes any of the violations identified in division (A)(1)(a) or (b) of this section and would constitute a criminal offense under the specified section of the Revised Code, if the victim of the violation is at the time of the violation a child under eighteen years of age or a child with a developmental disability or physical impairment under twenty-one years of age. The court need not find that any person has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to the offense under the specified section of the Revised Code in order for the conduct that is the violation constituting the offense to be childhood sexual abuse for purposes of this division. This division applies to any of the following violations committed in the following specified circumstances: (a) A violation of section 2907.02 or section 2907.03 of the Revised Code; (b) A violation of section 2907.05 or 2907.06 of the Revised Code if, at the time of the violation, any of the following apply: (i) The actor is the victim's natural parent, adoptive parent, or stepparent or the guardian, custodian, or person in loco parentis of the victim. (ii) The victim is in custody of law or a patient in a hospital or other institution, and the actor has supervisory or disciplinary authority over the victim. (iii) The actor is a teacher, administrator, coach, or other person in authority employed by or serving in a school for which the director of education and workforce prescribes minimum standards pursuant to division (D) of section 3301.07 of the Revised Code, the victim is enrolled in or attends that school, and the actor is not enrolled in and does not attend that school. (iv) The actor is a teacher, administrator, coach, or other person in authority employed by or serving in an institution of higher education, and the victim is enrolled in or attends that institution. (v) The actor is the victim's athletic or other type of coach, is the victim's instructor, is the leader of a scouting troop of which the victim is a member, or is a person with temporary or occasional disciplinary control over the victim. (vi) The actor is a mental health professional, the victim is a mental health client or patient of the actor, and the actor induces the victim to submit by falsely representing to the victim that the sexual contact involved in the violation is necessary for mental health treatment purposes. (vii) The actor is a licensed medical professional, the victim is a patient of the actor, and the sexual contact occurs in the course of medical treatment. (viii) The victim is confined in a detention facility, and the actor is an employee of that detention facility. (ix) The actor is a cleric, and the victim is a member of, or attends, the church or congregation served by the cleric. (2) "Cleric" has the same meaning as in section 2317.02 of the Revised Code. (3) "Licensed medical professional" has the same meaning as in section 2907.01 of the Revised Code. (4) "Mental health client or patient" has the same meaning as in section 2305.51 of the Revised Code. (5) "Mental health professional" has the same meaning as in section 2305.115 of the Revised Code. (6) "Sexual contact" has the same meaning as in section 2907.01 of the Revised Code. (7) "Student" means any person who is enrolled on a full-time or part-time basis in any of the following: (a) A state institution of higher education as defined in section 3345.011 of the Revised Code; (b) A nonprofit institution holding a certificate of authorization pursuant to Chapter 1713. of the Revised Code; (c) An institution holding a certificate of registration from the state board of career colleges and schools under Chapter 3332. of the Revised Code; (d) A private institution exempt from regulation under Chapter 3332. of the Revised Code as prescribed in section 3333.046 of the Revised Code; (e) An Ohio technical center as defined in section 3333.94 of the Revised Code. (8) "Student sexual abuse" means any conduct that constitutes a violation of section 2907.02, 2907.03, 2907.05, or 2907.06 of the Revised Code, if the victim of the violation is at the time of the violation over seventeen years of age but under twenty-four years of age, and the abuse occurred when the victim was a student. The court need not find that any person has been convicted of or pleaded guilty to the offense under the specified section of the Revised Code in order for the conduct that is the violation constituting the offense to be student sexual abuse for purposes of this section. (9) "Victim" means, except as provided in division (B) of this section, a victim of childhood sexual abuse. (B) Except as provided in section 2305.115 of the Revised Code and subject to division (C)divisions (C) and (D) of this section, an action for assault or battery shall be brought within one year after the cause of the action accrues. For purposes of this section, a cause of action for assault or battery accrues upon the later of the following: (1) The date on which the alleged assault or battery occurred; (2) If the plaintiff did not know the identity of the person who allegedly committed the assault or battery on the date on which it allegedly occurred, the earlier of the following dates: (a) The date on which the plaintiff learns the identity of that person; (b) The date on which, by the exercise of reasonable diligence, the plaintiff should have learned the identity of that person. (C)(C)(1) An action shall be brought within thirty-seven years after the cause of action accrues if both of the following apply: (a) The action is an action for assault or battery brought by a victim of childhood sexual abuse based on childhood sexual abuse, or an action brought by a victim of childhood sexual abuse asserting any claim resulting from childhood sexual abuse, shall be brought within twelve years after the cause of action accrues. (b) The action is against a perpetrator of the childhood sexual abuse, an entity that negligently facilitated that sexual abuse, or both. (2) If a DNA record made in connection with an action brought by a victim of childhood sexual abuse asserting a claim resulting from childhood sexual abuse is determined to match another DNA record that is of an identifiable person and if the time of the determination is later than thirty-seven years after the action accrues, the action may be brought within five years after the determination is complete. (3) For purposes of this section, a cause of action for assault or battery based on childhood sexual abuse, or a cause of action for a claim resulting from childhood sexual abuse, accrues upon the date on which the victim reaches the age of majority. (4) If the defendant in an action brought by a victim of childhood sexual abuse asserting a claim resulting from childhood sexual abuse that occurs on or after August 3, 2006, has fraudulently concealed from the plaintiff facts that form the basis of the claim, the running of the limitations period with regard to that claim is tolled until the time when the plaintiff discovers or in the exercise of due diligence should have discovered those facts, and the action may be brought within five years after the discovery of the fraudulently concealed facts. (D)(1) An action shall be brought at any time until the victim reaches fifty-five years of age if both of the following apply: (a) The action is an action for assault or battery brought by a victim of student sexual abuse based on student sexual abuse, or an action brought by a victim of student sexual abuse asserting any claim resulting from student sexual abuse. (b) The action is against a perpetrator of the student sexual abuse or an entity that negligently facilitated that sexual abuse. (2) If a DNA record made in connection with an action brought by a victim of student sexual abuse asserting a claim resulting from student sexual abuse is determined to match another DNA record that is of an identifiable person and if the time of the determination is later than the time at which the victim reaches fifty-five years of age, the action may be brought within five years after the determination is complete. If the defendant in an action brought by a victim of student sexual abuse asserting a claim resulting from student sexual abuse that occurs on or after the effective date of this section has fraudulently concealed from the plaintiff facts that form the basis of the claim, the running of the limitations period with regard to that claim is tolled until the time when the plaintiff discovers or in the exercise of due diligence should have discovered those facts, and the action may be brought within five years after the discovery of the fraudulently concealed facts. Section 4. That existing section 2305.111 of the Revised Code that is scheduled to take effect on October 12, 2028, is hereby repealed. Section 5. Sections 3 and 4 of this act take effect on October 12, 2028.